Hawaii statutes.
§392-63 Disbursements from the fund.
Expenditures of moneys in the trust fund for disability benefits shall not be
subject to any provisions of law requiring specific appropriations or other
formal release by state officers of money in their custody. All benefits shall
be paid from the fund upon warrants drawn upon the director of finance by the
comptroller of the State supported by vouchers approved by the director. [L
1969, c 148, pt of §1; am L 2013, c 100, §8]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next